Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS

CHAPTER 792. INTERNATIONAL COOPERATION AGREEMENTS

Sec. 792.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Political subdivision" has the meaning assigned by Section 791.003.

(2) "State agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 783.003.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1165, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Sec. 792.002. AGREEMENTS WITH MEXICO. A state agency or a political subdivision may, to the extent permitted under federal law, enter into an agreement under this chapter with:

(1) the United Mexican States or a political subdivision of the United Mexican States;

(2) an agency of the United States; or

(3) an agency or entity that is created under a treaty or executive agreement between the United States and the United Mexican States.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1165, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Sec. 792.003. SCOPE OF AGREEMENT. A state agency or a political subdivision may enter into an agreement under this chapter only if the agreement is for the accomplishment of a function that the agency or political subdivision is authorized to perform under other law.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1165, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Sec. 792.004. TERMS. (a) Under an agreement authorized by this chapter, a political subdivision or a state agency may:

(1) acquire or dispose of in any manner available to the state agency or political subdivision under other law an interest in real property in this state or the United Mexican States;

(2) use any funds of the state agency or political subdivision that are not otherwise dedicated by law for another purpose to accomplish the purposes of the agreement;

(3) use any equipment, facilities, or other property of the state agency or political subdivision to carry out the agreement; or

(4) agree to any other terms that are not prohibited under state or federal law.

(b) An agreement made under this chapter may not provide for the liability of this state or a political subdivision on a bond or other obligation issued by the United Mexican States or a political subdivision of the United Mexican States.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1165, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Sec. 792.005. BONDS. (a) A state agency described by Subsection (b) or a political subdivision may issue bonds or other evidence of indebtedness to provide financing for an agreement under this chapter to the same extent and in the same manner that the agency or political subdivision is authorized to issue the bonds or other evidence of indebtedness to perform the activity on its own behalf.

(b) Only the following state agencies may issue bonds under this section:

(1) the Department of Agriculture;

(2) the Texas Department of Economic Development;

(3) the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs;

(4) the Texas Public Finance Authority;

(5) the Texas Turnpike Authority; or

(6) the Texas Water Development Board.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1165, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Sec. 792.006. APPROVAL OF GOVERNOR AND LEGISLATIVE BUDGET BOARD. An agreement made by a state agency under this chapter that involves the use of money appropriated from the state treasury is not valid unless it is approved by the governor and the Legislative Budget Board.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1165, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.